Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1312.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 16-650, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE16-650. Declaration of election to office; delivery of certificate of election The secretary of state shall declare elected the person receiving the highest number of votes cast for each office for which the nominees filed nominating petitions and papers with the secretary of state pursuant to section 16-311, subsection B  e and shall, unless enjoined from so doing by an order of court, deliver to each such person, upon in compliance with the provisions imposed by law upon on candidates for office as conditions precedent to the issuance of the certificates, a certificate of election, signed by the secretary of state and authenticated with the great seal of the this state. END_STATUTE